Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.130

Budget—Requirements for balancing estimated expenditures.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5412-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

For each fund contained in the school district budget the estimated expenditures for the budgeted fiscal year must not be greater than the total of the estimated revenues for the budgeted fiscal year, the estimated fund balance at the beginning of the budgeted fiscal year less the estimated reserve fund balance at the end of the budgeted fiscal year, and the projected revenue from receivables collectible on future years as approved by the superintendent of public instruction for inclusion in the budget.

The proceeds of any interfund loan must not be used to balance the budget of the borrowing fund, except in fiscal year 2024 when such loans may be used to address budget destabilization in the aftermath of the COVID-19 pandemic. Interfund loans in fiscal year 2024 may be for a duration of two years.

[ 2023 c 435 s 11; 1983 c 59 s 9; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 13. Formerly RCW 28A.65.460.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.